Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-701
State capital; location.

The city of Lincoln is declared to be the permanent seat of government of the State of Nebraska, at which all the public offices of the state shall be kept and at which all the sessions of the Legislature shall be held.

Laws 1867, § 3, p. 53;

R.S.1913, § 5885;

C.S.1922, § 5248;

C.S.1929, § 72-701;

R.S.1943, § 72-701.